Massachusetts, session 194th, H2772.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 58 of chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting, in line 20, after the word “or,” the following words:- in the case
of a probation officer, receives bodily injuries resulting from acts of violence perpetrated on
them while in the performance of their duties or,
of 1